hfst/noun-som-morph.txt
! Can specify test words that should be generated with the paradigm here, but currently it will only generate the words, not compare to what should be the outcome.

! TODO: Plurals and no case? +N+Masc+Pl+Indef:oyin	FINAL ;
! Specifying plurals with no case, when they should probably be all cases if 
! they're bare plurals

! Need to check ordering of all tag categories. Would be nice if it were the same everywhere


! How do I mark gender changes? plurals don't have gender morphs, but do they agree?
! Probably should. Or at least make it possible to generate without the gender change... E.g., 
!		magac+N+Masc+Indef+Pl -> magacyo
!		magac+N+Fem+Indef+Pl -> magacyo

! Currently:
!		magacyo -> magac+N+Fem+Indef+Pl
!
! So, do we want to have it analyse as both masc and fem, or analyse as only one with the gender change?
! Should ideally abstract away from morphology, marking both Masc and Fem implies morphology is more relevant in generation.


LEXICON NOUN1_F
:{#}@N@		NOUN1_F_PostBound ; 

LEXICON NOUN1_F_PostBound
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                              ! TEST:warqad,warqad
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Nom:i		         FINAL ;                              ! TEST:warqad,warqad
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                              ! TEST:warqad,warqad
+N+Masc+Pl+Indef:o		     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above      ! TEST:warqad,warqado

+N+Fem+Sg+Def:t		SgProximity ;

+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Prox:aha      FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above    ! TEST:warqad,warqadaha
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Prox:uhu      FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above    ! TEST:warqad,warqaduhu
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Dist:ihii     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above    ! TEST:warqad,warqadihii
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Dist:ihii     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above    ! TEST:warqad,warqadihii


LEXICON NOUN1_M/SgOnly
:{#}@N@		NOUN1_M_PostBoundary/SgOnly ;

LEXICON NOUN1_M
:{#}@N@		NOUN1_M_PostBoundary ;

LEXICON NOUN1_M_PostBoundary
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Pl:o		     FINAL ;                                   ! TEST:guri,guriyo

+N+Masc+Def+Sg:g		SgProximity ;
+N+Masc+Def:			MascPl ;

LEXICON NOUN1_M_PostBoundary/SgOnly
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri

+N+Masc+Def+Sg:g		SgProximity ;

! Same?
LEXICON NOUNM/NoPlural
:{#}@N@		NOUNM/NoPlural_PostBoundary ;

LEXICON NOUNM/NoPlural_PostBoundary
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                               ! TEST:guri,guri

+N+Masc+Def+Sg:k		SgProximity ;


LEXICON NOUN2_M
:{#}@N@ NOUN2_M_PostBoundary ;

LEXICON NOUN2_M_PostBoundary
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                                ! TEST:subax,subax
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                                ! TEST:subax,subax
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                                ! TEST:subax,subax
+N+Fem+Pl+Indef:{C2}o		     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above        ! TEST:subax,subaxyo

+N+Masc+Def+Sg:k		SgProximity ;

+N+Fem+Def+Pl+Abs+Prox:{C2}ada    FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above        ! TEST:subax,subaxyada
+N+Fem+Def+Pl+Nom+Prox:{C2}adu    FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above        ! TEST:subax,subaxyadu
+N+Fem+Def+Pl+Abs+Dist:{C2}adii   FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above        ! TEST:subax,subaxyadii
+N+Fem+Def+Pl+Nom+Dist:{C2}adii   FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above        ! TEST:subax,subaxyadii


! D2 masc masc words= Any?

LEXICON NOUN2_F
+TODO						FINAL ;


LEXICON NOUN3_F 
:{#}@N@ NOUN3_F_PostBoundary ;

LEXICON NOUN3_F_PostBoundary
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                                       ! TEST:galab,galab
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                                       ! TEST:galab,galab
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                                       ! TEST:galab,galab
+N+Masc+Pl+Indef:o		     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above               ! TEST:galab,galbo
! Need to check these with a corpus

+N+Fem+Def+Sg:t		SgProximity ;
+N+Masc+Def:			MascPl ;


LEXICON NOUN3_M
:{#}@N@ NOUN3_M_PostBoundary ;

LEXICON NOUN3_M_PostBoundary
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                                       ! TEST:ilig,ilig
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                                       ! TEST:ilig,ilig
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                                       ! TEST:ilig,ilig
+N+Masc+Pl+Indef:o		     FINAL ;	                                       ! TEST:ilig,ilko

+N+Masc+Def+Sg:k		SgProximity ;
+N+Masc+Def:			MascPl ;

! Notes on progress: 
!  - Vow deletion in pl works, except there are some funny side effects.
!  - xadhig -> xadhgo
!  - what is probably needed here is a rule changing 'voicing' in final positions
!  - qalinka doesn't work for some reason.: qalmka does. uh oh 






! Declension 4 fem? how do these work?
LEXICON NOUN4_F 
+TODO:0 FINAL ; 
! +N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                                       
! +N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                                       
! +N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                                       
! +N+Masc+Pl+Indef:%>o		     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above               
! +N+Fem+Def+Sg+Abs+Prox:%>ta	     FINAL ;                                           
! +N+Fem+Def+Sg+Nom+Prox:%>tu         FINAL ;                                        
! +N+Fem+Def+Sg+Abs+Dist:%>tii	     FINAL ;                                       
! +N+Fem+Def+Sg+Nom+Dist:%>tii	     FINAL ;                                       
! +N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Prox:%>aha      FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above             
! +N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Prox:%>uhu      FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above             
! +N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Dist:%>ihii     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above             
! +N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Dist:%>ihii     FINAL ; ! See gender polarity above             

LEXICON NOUN4_M
:{#}@N@		NOUN4_M_PostBoundary ;

LEXICON NOUN4_M_PostBoundary
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs:0		         FINAL ;                                        ! TEST:qoys,qoys
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom:0		         FINAL ;                                        ! TEST:qoys,qoys
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Gen:0		         FINAL ;                                        ! TEST:qoys,qoys
+N+Fem+Pl+Indef:a{C2}		     FINAL ;	                                        ! TEST:qoys,qoysas
+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Abs+Prox:ka	     FINAL ;                                        ! TEST:qoys,qoyska
+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Nom+Prox:ku        FINAL ;                                         ! TEST:qoys,qoysku
+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Abs+Dist:kii	     FINAL ;                                        ! TEST:qoys,qoyskii
+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Nom+Dist:kii	     FINAL ;                                        ! TEST:qoys,qoyskii
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Prox:a{C2}{#}ka      FINAL ;                                          ! TEST:qoys,qoysaska
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Prox:a{C2}{#}ku      FINAL ;                                          ! TEST:qoys,qoysasku
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Dist:a{C2}{#}kii     FINAL ;                                          ! TEST:qoys,qoysaskii
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Dist:a{C2}{#}kii     FINAL ;                                          ! TEST:qoys,qoysaskii


! TODO

LEXICON NOUN6_F
:{#}@N@	NOUN6_F_PostBoundary ;

LEXICON NOUN6_F_PostBoundary
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Abs:0	FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Nom:0	FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Indef+Sg+Gen:0	FINAL ;

+N+Fem+Def+Sg+Abs+Prox:da		FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Def+Sg+Nom+Prox:du        FINAL ;       
+N+Fem+Def+Sg+Abs+Dist:dii	     FINAL ;      
+N+Fem+Def+Sg+Nom+Dist:dii	     FINAL ; 

+N+Masc+Indef+Pl:oyin	FINAL ;

+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Prox:oyinka	FINAL ;
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Prox:oyinku	FINAL ;

+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs+Dist:oyinkii	FINAL ;
+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom+Dist:oyinkii	FINAL ;

! Expecting gender morphemes, t/d/k/g
LEXICON SgProximity

+Abs+Prox:a			FINAL ;
					Possessive ; ! Should there be a morpheme boundary here? 

+Nom+Prox:u			FINAL ;
+Abs+Dist:ii		FINAL ;
+Nom+Dist:ii		FINAL ;

+Abs+Close:an		FINAL ;
+Nom+Close:anu		FINAL ;
+Nom+Close:ani		FINAL ;

+Abs+Near:aas			FINAL ;	
+Nom+Near:aasu			FINAL ;	
+Nom+Near:aasi			FINAL ;	

+Abs+Far:eer			FINAL ;	
+Nom+Far:eeri			FINAL ;	

+Abs+Farther:oo			FINAL ;	
+Nom+Farther:ooyi		FINAL ;	

! Long forms (abs) 
! 1Sg      káyga			táyda
! 2Sg      káaga			táada
! 3SgM     kíisa			tíisa
!  SgF     kéeda			téeda
! 1PlI     kéenna			téenna
! 1PlE     kayága			tayáda
! 2Pl      kíinna			tíinna
! 3Pl      kóoda			tóoda


! Short forms
!		   Subj		Abs     	Subj		Abs
! 1Sg      káy		kaý	    	táy			taý	
! 2Sg      káa		kaá 		táa			taá 
! 3SgM     kíis		kiís		tíis		tiís
!  SgF     kéed		keéd		téed		teéd
! 1PlI     kéen		keén		téen		teén
! 1PlE     kayo		kayo		tayo		tayo
! 2Pl      kíin		kiín		tíin		tiín
! 3Pl      kóod		koód		tóod		toód

! Tone test
LEXICON Possessive
+PxSg1:áy{GD}		PostPossSgProx ;
+PxSg2:áa{GD}		PostPossSgProx ;
+PxSg3M:íis		PostPossSgProx ;
+PxSg3F:íis		PostPossSgProx ;

+PxPl1Incl:éenn		PostPossSgProx ; 
+PxPl1Excl:ayá{GD}		PostPossSgProx ; 
+PxPl2:íinn			PostPossSgProx ; 
+PxPl3:óod			PostPossSgProx ; 

+PxSg1+Nom:áy			FINAL ;
+PxSg2+Nom:áa			FINAL ;
+PxSg3M+Nom:íis			FINAL ;
+PxSg3F+Nom:íis			FINAL ;

+PxPl1Incl+Nom:éen		FINAL ; 
+PxPl1Excl+Nom:ayo		FINAL ; 
+PxPl2+Nom:íin			FINAL ; 
+PxPl3+Nom:óod			FINAL ; 

+PxSg1+Abs:aý			FINAL ;
+PxSg2+Abs:aá			FINAL ;
+PxSg3M+Abs:iís			FINAL ;
+PxSg3F+Abs:iís			FINAL ;

+PxPl1Incl+Abs:eén		FINAL ; 
+PxPl1Excl+Abs:ayo		FINAL ; 
+PxPl2+Abs:iín			FINAL ; 
+PxPl3+Abs:oód			FINAL ; 

! proximity and case for after possessive suffixes
! Need to restrict to prevent loops to infinity
LEXICON PostPossSgProx
+Abs+Prox:a			FINAL ;
+Nom+Prox:u			FINAL ;
+Abs+Dist:ii		FINAL ;
+Nom+Dist:ii		FINAL ;

! +Abs+Close:an		FINAL ;
! +Nom+Close:anu		FINAL ;
! +Nom+Close:ani		FINAL ;
! 
! +Abs+Near:aas			FINAL ;	
! +Nom+Near:aasu			FINAL ;	
! +Nom+Near:aasi			FINAL ;	
! 
! +Abs+Far:eer			FINAL ;	
! +Nom+Far:eeri			FINAL ;	
! 
! +Abs+Farther:oo			FINAL ;	
! +Nom+Farther:ooyi		FINAL ;	



! Expecting fem sg?
! TODO: boundaries here?
LEXICON MascPl
+Pl+Abs+Prox:aha      FINAL ;                                 ! TEST:guri,guriyaha
+Pl+Nom+Prox:uhu      FINAL ;                                 ! TEST:guri,guriyuhu
+Pl+Abs+Dist:ihii     FINAL ;                                 ! TEST:guri,guriyihii
+Pl+Nom+Dist:ihii     FINAL ;                                 ! TEST:guri,guriyihii

! TODO: generation not working here. hilibihii, hilbihii. Need some tests


!! Irregular nouns !!

LEXICON Irreg_WAX
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs+Prox:{#}@N@ FINAL ;
+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom+Prox:{#}@N@ FINAL ;

+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Abs+Dist:{#}@N@kii FINAL ;
+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Nom+Dist:{#}@N@kii FINAL ;

+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Abs+Prox:{#}@N@a FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Indef:{#}@N@yaabo FINAL ;



LEXICON NOUNF
+TODO:0	FINAL ;
